Utah statutes.
75-3-719.   Expenses in estate litigation.

If any personal representative or person nominated as personal representative defends or prosecutes any proceeding in good faith, whether successful or not, the personal representative is entitled to receive from the estate all necessary expenses and disbursements, including reasonable attorney fees incurred.  This provision expressly applies in a will contest to any person nominated as a personal representative in a testamentary instrument submitted in good faith.



Amended by Chapter 274, 2012 General Session

